Missouri, session 2026, SB892.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 161.092, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 161.092,
to read as follows:
161.092. The state board of education shall:
(1) Adopt rules governing its own proceedings and
formulate policies for the guidance of the commissioner of
education and the department of elementary and secondary
education;
(2) Carry out the educational policies of the state
relating to public schools that are provided by law and
supervise instruction in the public schools;
(3) Direct the investment of all moneys received by
the state to be applied to the capital of any permanent fund
established for the support of public education within the
jurisdiction of the department of elementary and secondary
education and see that the funds are applied to the branches
of educational interest of the state that by grant, gift,
devise or law they were originally intended, and if
necessary institute suit for and collect the funds and
return them to their legitimate channels;

SB 892 2
(4) Cause to be assembled information which will
reflect continuously the condition and management of the
public schools of the state;
(5) Require of county clerks or treasurers, boards of
education or other school officers, recorders and treasurers
of cities, towns and villages, copies of all records
required to be made by them and all other information in
relation to the funds and condition of schools and the
management thereof that is deemed necessary;
(6) Provide blanks suitable for use by officials in
reporting the information required by the board;
(7) When conditions demand, cause the laws relating to
schools to be published in a separate volume, with pertinent
notes and comments, for the guidance of those charged with
the execution of the laws;
(8) Grant, without fee except as provided in section
168.021, certificates of qualification and licenses to teach
in any of the public schools of the state, establish
requirements therefor, formulate regulations governing the
issuance thereof, and cause the certificates to be revoked
for the reasons and in the manner provided in section
168.071;
(9) Classify the public schools of the state, subject
to limitations provided by law and subdivision (14) of this
section, establish requirements for the schools of each
class, and formulate rules governing the inspection and
accreditation of schools preparatory to classification, with
such requirements taking effect not less than two years from
the date of adoption of the proposed rule by the state board
of education, provided that this condition shall not apply
to any requirement for which a time line for adoption is
mandated in either federal or state law. Such rules shall

SB 892 3
include a process to allow any district that is accredited
without provision that does not meet the state board's
promulgated criteria for a classification designation of
accredited with distinction to propose alternative criteria
to the state board to be classified as accredited with
distinction;
(10) Make an annual report on or before the first
Wednesday after the first day of January to the general
assembly or, when it is not in session, to the governor for
publication and transmission to the general assembly. The
report shall be for the last preceding school year, and
shall include:
(a) A statement of the number of public schools in the
state, the number of pupils attending the schools, their
sex, and the branches taught;
(b) A statement of the number of teachers employed,
their sex, their professional training, and their average
salary;
(c) A statement of the receipts and disbursements of
public school funds of every description, their sources, and
the purposes for which they were disbursed;
(d) Suggestions for the improvement of public schools;
and
(e) Any other information relative to the educational
interests of the state that the law requires or the board
deems important;
(11) Make an annual report to the general assembly and
the governor concerning coordination with other agencies and
departments of government that support family literacy
programs and other services which influence educational
attainment of children of all ages;

SB 892 4
(12) Require from the chief officer of each division
of the department of elementary and secondary education, on
or before the thirty-first day of August of each year,
reports containing information the board deems important and
desires for publication;
(13) Cause its annual report to be published on the
website of the department of elementary and secondary
education, and cause fifty copies of its annual report to be
reserved for the use of each division of the state
department of elementary and secondary education, and ten
copies for preservation in the state library;
(14) Promulgate rules under which the board shall
classify the public schools of the state; provided that the
appropriate scoring guides, instruments, and procedures used
in determining the accreditation status of a district shall
be subject to a public meeting upon notice in a newspaper of
general circulation in each of the three most populous
cities in the state and also a newspaper that is a certified
minority business enterprise or woman-owned business
100 enterprise in each of the two most populous cities in the
101 state, and notice to each district board of education, each
102 superintendent of a school district, and to the speaker of
103 the house of representatives, the president pro tem of the
104 senate, and the members of the joint committee on education,
105 at least fourteen days in advance of the meeting, which
106 shall be conducted by the department of elementary and
107 secondary education not less than ninety days prior to their
108 application in accreditation, with all comments received to
109 be reported to the state board of education;
110 (15) Have other powers and duties prescribed by law.
✓